Georgia, session 2025_26, SB121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in
Chapter 7, relating to kinds of insurance, limits of risk, and reinsurance, by adding a new
Code section to read as follows:
"33-7-16.
(a) No individual who is convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol with a blood
alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or higher, drugs, or other intoxicating substances in
violation of Code Section 40-6-391 or an equivalent law in another state shall operate any
S. B. 121
- 1 -

LC 46 1181S (SCS)
motor vehicle in this state unless such individual has motor vehicle liability insurance that,
at a minimum, provides for:
(1) Bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, not less than $50,000.00;
(2) Bodily injury to or death of all persons in any one accident, not less
than $100,000.00; and
(3) Loss of, damage to, or destruction of property in any one accident, not less
than $50,000.00.
(b) No individual who is convicted of a second offense of driving under the influence of
alcohol with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or higher, drugs, or other
intoxicating substances in violation of Code Section 40-6-391 or an equivalent law in
another state shall operate any motor vehicle in this state unless such individual has motor
vehicle liability insurance that, at a minimum, provides for:
(1) Bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, not less than
$100,000.00;
(2) Bodily injury to or death of all persons in any one accident, not less
than $300,000.00; and
(3) Loss of, damage to, or destruction of property in any one accident, not less
than $100,000.00.
(c) Any individual who is required to obtain the motor vehicle liability coverage provided
for in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall maintain no less than such coverage
uninterrupted for a period of three years from the date of conviction.
(d) The coverages provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall be in
lieu of the minimum motor vehicle liability insurance coverage required under Code
Section 33-7-11.
(e) As used in this Code section, the term 'conviction' means a jury's finding of guilty, a
guilty plea, or a plea of nolo contendere."
S. B. 121
- 2 -

LC 46 1181S (SCS)
SECTION 2.
Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is amended
in Code Section 40-6-10, relating to insurance requirements for operation of motor vehicles
generally, by adding a new paragraph in subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(1.3) Any individual who is required to maintain increased liability coverage as
provided for in Code Section 33-7-16 shall keep proof or evidence of such coverage
during the operation of any motor vehicle. Such proof or evidence of such coverage may
be produced in either paper or electronic format, including a display of electronic images
on a mobile electronic device."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval and shall apply to any convictions on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 121
- 3 -